Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.060

"Month" or "months."

The word "month" or "months," whenever the same occurs in the statutes of this state now in force, or in statutes hereinafter enacted, or in any contract made in this state, shall be taken and construed to mean "calendar months."

[1891 c 23 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 759; 1877 p 333 s 1; RRS s 149.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section is a part of 1891 c 23 s 1. The introductory phrase of that section provides: "The following provisions relative to the construction of statutes shall be rules of construction and shall constitute a part of the code of procedure of this state:".